test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-baerdna_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - bärdna: # N_EVEN_NOCG (no CGrad, but umlaut)
    bärdna+N+Sg+Nom: bärdna
    bärdna+N+Sg+Gen: bierdna
    bärdna+N+Sg+Acc: bierdnav
    bärdna+N+Sg+Ill: bärdnaj
    bärdna+N+Sg+Ine: bierdnan
    bärdna+N+Sg+Ela: [bierdnast, bierdnas]
    bärdna+N+Sg+Com: [bierdnajn, bierdnajna]
    bärdna+N+Pl+Nom: bierdna
    bärdna+N+Pl+Gen: bierdnaj
    bärdna+N+Pl+Acc: bierdnajd
    bärdna+N+Pl+Ill: bierdnajda
    bärdna+N+Pl+Ine: bierdnajn
    bärdna+N+Pl+Ela: [bierdnajst, bierdnajs]
    bärdna+N+Pl+Com: [bierdnaj, bierdnajgum]
    bärdna+N+Ess: bärdnan
